Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1708SV (2) 91 dg/jh S.F. 443 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. a. âCovered platformâ means a commercial entity for 3 which it is in the regular course of the trade or business of 4 the entity to create, host, or make available, on the internet, 5 obscene material provided by the entity, a user, or other 6 information content provider. 7 b. For purposes of this subsection, the presence alone of 8 obscene material on a commercial entityâs internet site shall 9 not be construed to mean that the commercial entityâs regular 10 course of trade or business is creating, hosting, or making 11 available obscene material on the internet. When determining 12 whether a commercial entityâs regular course of trade or 13 business is creating, hosting, or making available obscene 14 material on the internet, a court shall consider all of the 15 following: 16 (1) The amount of data that constitutes obscene material on 17 the commercial entityâs internet site. 18 (2) The amount of data that constitutes obscene material 19 on the commercial entityâs internet site in proportion to the 20 total amount of data on the commercial entityâs internet site. 21 (3) The amount of user traffic to obscene material on the 22 commercial entityâs internet site. 23 (4) The amount of user traffic to obscene material on the 24 commercial entityâs internet site in proportion to all user 25 traffic on the commercial entityâs internet site. 26 (5) The amount of revenue the commercial entity obtains from 27 obscene material on the commercial entityâs internet site. 28 (6) The amount of revenue the commercial entity generates 29 from obscene material on the commercial entityâs internet site 30 in proportion to all revenues the commercial entity generates. 31 (7) Any other factor the court deems relevant. 32 2. âIdentifying informationâ means any representation of 33 information that permits the identity of an individual to whom 34 the information applies to be reasonably inferred by either 35 -1- LSB 1708SV (2) 91 dg/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 443 direct or indirect means. 1 3. âInformation content providerâ means the same as defined 2 in 47 U.S.C. Â§230. 3 4. âInteractive computer serviceâ means the same as defined 4 in 47 U.S.C. Â§230. 5 5. âObscene materialâ means the same as defined in section 6 728.1. 7 6. âProviderâ means all of the following: 8 a. An internet service provider. 9 b. A cloud service provider. 10 c. A wireless service provider. 11 d. An internet search engine. 12 e. An information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Â§153. 13 f. A telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 14 Â§153. 15 g. A cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Â§522. 16 h. An affiliate or a subsidiary of an entity listed in 17 paragraph âaâ through âgâ . 18 7. âReasonable age verificationâ means verifying the age of 19 an individual by using any of the following methods: 20 a. Government-issued identification. 21 b. Financial documents or other documents that are reliable 22 proxies for age. 23 c. Any other commercially reasonable and reliable method. 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Publication and distribution 25 of obscene material on the internet ââ age verification ââ civil 26 liability. 27 1. A covered platform shall be held liable if the covered 28 platform fails to perform reasonable age verification of 29 individuals attempting to access obscene material published or 30 distributed by the covered platform. 31 2. Reasonable age verification required under subsection 32 1 may be performed by a third party subject to state 33 jurisdiction, and may employ cryptographic techniques such 34 as zero knowledge proofs to preserve anonymity and protect 35 -2- LSB 1708SV (2) 91 dg/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 443 privacy. 1 3. a. A covered platform or third party that performs the 2 reasonable age verification required under subsection 1 shall 3 not retain an individualâs identifying information after the 4 covered platform or third party completes the individualâs 5 reasonable age verification. 6 b. A covered platform or third party that performs the 7 reasonable age verification required under subsection 1 shall 8 not distribute, sell, or otherwise disseminate an individualâs 9 identifying information obtained through the covered platformâs 10 or third partyâs performance of reasonable age verification. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Enforcement ââ penalties. 12 1. If the attorney general has reasonable belief that a 13 covered platform, or third party performing reasonable age 14 verification, is in violation of this chapter, the attorney 15 general has the sole authority to bring civil action to provide 16 for all of the following: 17 a. Enjoinment of further violations by the covered platform 18 or third party performing reasonable age verification. 19 b. Enforcement of compliance with this chapter. 20 c. Assessment of civil penalties in an amount not more than 21 ten thousand dollars for each violation of this chapter. 22 d. Other remedies permitted under law. 23 2. If the attorney general has reasonable belief that a 24 covered platform, or third party performing reasonable age 25 verification, is in violation of an injunction issued under 26 this section, the attorney general has the sole authority to 27 bring civil action to provide for civil penalties in an amount 28 not more than one hundred thousand dollars. 29 3. An individual that has knowledge of a violation of this 30 chapter may report the violation to the attorney general. 31 4. The attorney general shall establish an electronic 32 reporting system for the submission of reports pursuant to this 33 section. 34 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554I.4 Limitations on liability. 35 -3- LSB 1708SV (2) 91 dg/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 443 1. This chapter shall not be construed to impose liability 1 on a user of an interactive computer service on the internet. 2 2. This chapter shall not be construed to impose liability 3 on a provider solely for providing access or connection to 4 a covered platform, or to obscene material on an internet 5 site or in a facility, system, or network not under the 6 providerâs control. For purposes of this subsection, âaccess 7 or connectionâ includes but is not limited to transmitting, 8 downloading, providing intermediate storage for, and providing 9 access software for data. 10